Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-12,145.01
Employer, defined.

For purposes of the Site and Building Development Act, employer has the same meaning as in subdivision (6) of section 77-6546.

Laws 2026, LB1165, § 24.
April 17, 2026